New Mexico, session 2026, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATIONS.--
A. The following amounts are appropriated from the
public project revolving fund to the following funds:
(1) six million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($6,250,000) to the drinking water state revolving
loan fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent
fiscal years to provide state matching funds for federal Safe
Drinking Water Act of 1974 projects and to carry out the
purposes of the Drinking Water State Revolving Loan Fund Act;
(2) two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the
local government planning fund for expenditure in fiscal year
2027 and subsequent fiscal years to carry out the purposes of
the fund; and

(3) five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the

cultural affairs facilities infrastructure fund for

expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years

to carry out the purposes of the fund.

B. Any unexpended or unencumbered balances
HB 64
Page 1

remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the
public project revolving fund. HB 64
Page 2